sk_SK-lemma/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1444 N 1
SFX 1444 ať zte .
SFX 1445 N 1
SFX 1445 iasť adiem .
SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 iasť adieš .
SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 iasť adie .
SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 iasť adieme .
SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 iasť adiete .
SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 iasť adú .
SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 iasť aď .
SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 iasť aďme .
SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 iasť aďte .
SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 iasť adúc .
SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 ásť asiem .
SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 ásť asieš .
SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 ásť asie .
SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 ásť asieme .
SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 ásť asiete .
SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 ásť asú .
SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 ásť as .
SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 ásť asme .
SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 ásť aste .
SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 ásť asúc .
SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 äť nem .
SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 äť neš .
SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 äť ne .
SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 äť neme .
SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 äť nete .
SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 äť nú .
SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 äť ni .
SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 äť nime .
SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 äť nite .
SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 äť núc .
SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 iecť ec .
SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 cť kni .
SFX 1477 N 1
SFX 1477 iecť ecme .
SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 cť knime .
SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 iecť ecte .
SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 cť knite .
SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 ásť astiem .
SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 ásť astieš .
SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 ásť astie .
SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 ásť astieme .
SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 ásť astiete .
SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 ásť astú .
SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 ásť asti .
SFX 1488 N 1
SFX 1488 ásť asť .
SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 ásť astime .
SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 ásť asťme .
SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 ásť asťte .
SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 ásť astite .
SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 ásť astúc .
SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 ť tol .
SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 ť tla .
SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 ť tlo .
SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 ť tli .
SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 ka ák .
SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 kať čem .
SFX 1500 N 1
SFX 1500 kať češ .
SFX 1501 N 1
SFX 1501 kať če .
SFX 1502 N 1
SFX 1502 kať čeme .
SFX 1503 N 1
SFX 1503 kať čete .
SFX 1504 N 1
SFX 1504 kať ču .
SFX 1505 N 1
SFX 1505 kať č .
SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 kať čme .
SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 kať čte .
SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 kať čuc .
SFX 1509 N 1
SFX 1509 ť nem .
SFX 1510 N 1
SFX 1510 ť neš .
SFX 1511 N 1
SFX 1511 ť ne .
SFX 1512 N 1
SFX 1512 ť neme .
SFX 1513 N 1
SFX 1513 ť nete .
SFX 1514 N 1
SFX 1514 ť nú .
SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 ť ň .
SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 ť ňme .
SFX 1517 N 1
SFX 1517 ť ňte .
SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 ť núc .
SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 cať čem .
SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 cať češ .
SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 cať če .
SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 cať čeme .
SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 cať čete .
SFX 1524 N 1
SFX 1524 cať ču .
SFX 1525 N 1
SFX 1525 cať č .
SFX 1526 N 1
SFX 1526 cať čme .
SFX 1527 N 1
SFX 1527 cať čte .
SFX 1528 N 1
SFX 1528 cať čuc .
SFX 1529 N 1
SFX 1529 ĺcť lčiem .
SFX 1530 N 1
SFX 1530 ĺcť lčieš .
SFX 1531 N 1
SFX 1531 ĺcť lčie .
SFX 1532 N 1
SFX 1532 ĺcť lčieme .
SFX 1533 N 1
SFX 1533 ĺcť lčiete .
SFX 1534 N 1
SFX 1534 ĺcť lčú .
SFX 1535 N 1
SFX 1535 ĺcť lč .
SFX 1536 N 1
SFX 1536 ĺcť lčme .
SFX 1537 N 1
SFX 1537 ĺcť lčte .
SFX 1538 N 1
SFX 1538 ĺcť lčúc .
SFX 1539 N 1
SFX 1539 dieť ď .
SFX 1540 N 1
SFX 1540 dieť ďme .
SFX 1541 N 1
SFX 1541 dieť ďte .
SFX 1542 N 1
SFX 1542 iesť ediem .
SFX 1543 N 1
SFX 1543 iesť edieš .
SFX 1544 N 1
SFX 1544 iesť edie .
SFX 1545 N 1
SFX 1545 iesť edieme .
SFX 1546 N 1
SFX 1546 iesť ediete .
SFX 1547 N 1
SFX 1547 iesť edú .
SFX 1548 N 1
SFX 1548 iesť eď .
SFX 1549 N 1
SFX 1549 iesť eďme .
SFX 1550 N 1
SFX 1550 iesť eďte .
SFX 1551 N 1
SFX 1551 iesť edúc .
SFX 1552 N 1
SFX 1552 nuť em .
SFX 1553 N 1
SFX 1553 nuť eš .
SFX 1554 N 1
SFX 1554 nuť e .
SFX 1555 N 1
SFX 1555 nuť eme .
SFX 1556 N 1
SFX 1556 nuť ete .
SFX 1557 N 1
SFX 1557 nuť i .
SFX 1558 N 1
SFX 1558 nuť ime .
SFX 1559 N 1
SFX 1559 nuť ite .
SFX 1560 N 1
SFX 1560 dnuť ol .
SFX 1561 N 1
SFX 1561 dnuť la .
SFX 1562 N 1
SFX 1562 dnuť lo .
SFX 1563 N 1
SFX 1563 dnuť li .
SFX 1564 N 1
SFX 1564 edieť iem .
SFX 1565 N 1
SFX 1565 edieť ieš .
SFX 1566 N 1
SFX 1566 edieť ie .
SFX 1567 N 1
SFX 1567 edieť ieme .
SFX 1568 N 1
SFX 1568 edieť iete .
SFX 1569 N 1
SFX 1569 bať em .
SFX 1570 N 1
SFX 1570 bať eš .
SFX 1571 N 1
SFX 1571 bať e .
SFX 1572 N 1
SFX 1572 bať eme .
SFX 1573 N 1
SFX 1573 bať ete .
SFX 1574 N 1
SFX 1574 bať i .
SFX 1575 N 1
SFX 1575 bať ime .
SFX 1576 N 1
SFX 1576 bať ite .
SFX 1577 N 1
SFX 1577 vať em .
SFX 1578 N 1
SFX 1578 vať eš .
SFX 1579 N 1
SFX 1579 vať e .
SFX 1580 N 1
SFX 1580 vať eme .
SFX 1581 N 1
SFX 1581 vať ete .
SFX 1582 N 1
SFX 1582 vať i .
SFX 1583 N 1
SFX 1583 vať ime .
SFX 1584 N 1
SFX 1584 vať ite .
SFX 1585 N 1
SFX 1585 ťať tnem .
SFX 1586 N 1
SFX 1586 ťať tneš .
SFX 1587 N 1
SFX 1587 ťať tne .
SFX 1588 N 1
SFX 1588 ťať tneme .
SFX 1589 N 1
SFX 1589 ťať tnete .
SFX 1590 N 1
SFX 1590 ťať tnú .
SFX 1591 N 1
SFX 1591 ťať tni .
SFX 1592 N 1
SFX 1592 ťať tnime .
SFX 1593 N 1
SFX 1593 ťať tnite .
SFX 1594 N 1
SFX 1594 ťať tnúc .
SFX 1595 N 1
SFX 1595 ať nem .
SFX 1596 N 1
SFX 1596 ať neš .
SFX 1597 N 1
SFX 1597 ať ne .
SFX 1598 N 1
SFX 1598 ať neme .
SFX 1599 N 1
SFX 1599 ať nete .
SFX 1600 N 1
SFX 1600 ať nú .
SFX 1601 N 1
SFX 1601 ať ni .
SFX 1602 N 1
SFX 1602 ať nime .
SFX 1603 N 1
SFX 1603 ať nite .
SFX 1604 N 1
SFX 1604 ať núc .
SFX 1605 N 1
SFX 1605 vať jem .
SFX 1606 N 1
SFX 1606 vať ješ .
SFX 1607 N 1
SFX 1607 vať je .
SFX 1608 N 1
SFX 1608 vať jeme .
SFX 1609 N 1
SFX 1609 vať jete .
SFX 1610 N 1
SFX 1610 vať jú .
SFX 1611 N 1
SFX 1611 vať j .
SFX 1612 N 1
SFX 1612 vať jme .
SFX 1613 N 1
SFX 1613 vať jte .
SFX 1614 N 1
SFX 1614 vať júc .
SFX 1615 N 1
SFX 1615 evo iev .
SFX 1616 N 1
SFX 1616 tať ctaj .
SFX 1617 N 1
SFX 1617 tať ctajte .
SFX 1618 N 1
SFX 1618 é ých .
SFX 1619 N 1
SFX 1619 é ými .
SFX 1620 N 1
SFX 1620 ory ôr .
SFX 1621 N 1
SFX 1621 er rermi .
SFX 1622 N 1
SFX 1622 ďať dím .
SFX 1623 N 1
SFX 1623 ďať díš .
SFX 1624 N 1
SFX 1624 ďať dí .
SFX 1625 N 1
SFX 1625 ďať díme .
SFX 1626 N 1
SFX 1626 ďať díte .
SFX 1627 N 1
SFX 1627 ďať dia .
SFX 1628 N 1
SFX 1628 ďať di .
SFX 1629 N 1
SFX 1629 ďať dime .
SFX 1630 N 1
SFX 1630 ďať dite .
SFX 1631 N 1
SFX 1631 ďať diac .
SFX 1632 N 1
SFX 1632 uma úm .
SFX 1633 N 1
SFX 1633 a oma .
SFX 1634 N 1
SFX 1634 a omi .
SFX 1635 N 1
SFX 1635 0 ja .
SFX 1636 N 1
SFX 1636 ťka tiek .
SFX 1637 N 1
SFX 1637 cia iec .
SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 ia ami .
SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 ere ier .
SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 r om .
SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 olo ôl .
SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 opa ôp .
SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 lo el .
SFX 1644 N 1
SFX 1644 yha ýh .
SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 amo ám .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 a .
PFX 1646 Y 1
PFX 1646 dá da .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 u .
PFX 1647 Y 1
PFX 1647 dá da .
SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 ážď aždi .
SFX 1649 Y 1
SFX 1649 0 om .
PFX 1649 Y 1
PFX 1649 dá da .
SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 ážď ažde .
SFX 1651 Y 1
SFX 1651 0 ov .
PFX 1651 Y 1
PFX 1651 dá da .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 och .
PFX 1652 Y 1
PFX 1652 dá da .
SFX 1653 Y 1
SFX 1653 0 ami .
PFX 1653 Y 1
PFX 1653 dá da .
SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 sť dem .
SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 sť deš .
SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 sť de .
SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 sť deme .
SFX 1658 N 1
SFX 1658 sť dete .
SFX 1659 N 1
SFX 1659 sť du .
SFX 1660 N 1
SFX 1660 sť di .
SFX 1661 N 1
SFX 1661 sť dime .
SFX 1662 N 1
SFX 1662 sť dite .
SFX 1663 N 1
SFX 1663 sť duc .
SFX 1664 N 1
SFX 1664 ôjsť ošiel .
SFX 1665 N 1
SFX 1665 ôjsť ošla .
SFX 1666 N 1
SFX 1666 ôjsť ošlo .
SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 ôjsť ošli .
SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 udo úd .
SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 in nami .
SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 auto áut .
SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 ulta últ .
SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 ba ob .
SFX 1673 N 1
SFX 1673 ipsa íps .
SFX 1674 Y 1
SFX 1674 ý ejších .
PFX 1674 Y 1
PFX 1674 0 najd .
SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 argo árg .
SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 edo ied .
SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 erto iert .
SFX 1678 N 1
SFX 1678 uro úr .
SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 niaze ňazí .
SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 ľby lieb .
SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 lum iel .
SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 ansa áns .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 a 0 .
PFX 1683 Y 1
PFX 1683 fa fá .
SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 anga áng .
SFX 1685 N 1
SFX 1685 oš še .
SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 oš ši .
SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 oš šou .
SFX 1688 N 1
SFX 1688 oš ší .
SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 oš šiam .
SFX 1690 N 1
SFX 1690 oš šiach .
SFX 1691 N 1
SFX 1691 oš šami .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 um 0 .
PFX 1692 Y 1
PFX 1692 fa fá .
SFX 1693 N 1
SFX 1693 x gu .
SFX 1694 N 1
SFX 1694 x gom .
SFX 1695 N 1
SFX 1695 x gy .
SFX 1696 N 1
SFX 1696 x gov .
SFX 1697 N 1
SFX 1697 x goch .
SFX 1698 N 1
SFX 1698 x gami .
SFX 1699 N 1
SFX 1699 udum úd .
SFX 1700 N 1
SFX 1700 ala áb .
SFX 1701 N 1
SFX 1701 asko ásk .
SFX 1702 N 1
SFX 1702 iga íb .
SFX 1703 Y 1
SFX 1703 a 0 .
PFX 1703 Y 1
PFX 1703 fi fí .
SFX 1704 N 1
SFX 1704 opta ôpt .
SFX 1705 N 1
SFX 1705 auta áut .
SFX 1706 N 1
SFX 1706 ik ka .
SFX 1707 N 1
SFX 1707 ik ku .
SFX 1708 N 1
SFX 1708 ik kom .
SFX 1709 N 1
SFX 1709 ik ky .
SFX 1710 N 1
SFX 1710 ik kov .
SFX 1711 N 1
SFX 1711 ik koch .
SFX 1712 N 1
SFX 1712 ik kami .
SFX 1713 N 1
SFX 1713 inta ínt .
SFX 1714 N 1
SFX 1714 idum íd .
SFX 1715 N 1
SFX 1715 o áh .
SFX 1716 N 1
SFX 1716 eba ieb .
SFX 1717 N 1
SFX 1717 ina íb .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 a 0 .
PFX 1718 Y 1
PFX 1718 fr fŕ .
SFX 1719 N 1
SFX 1719 onta ônt .
SFX 1720 N 1
SFX 1720 uga úg .
SFX 1721 N 1
SFX 1721 ňať ním .
SFX 1722 N 1
SFX 1722 ňať níš .
SFX 1723 N 1
SFX 1723 ňať ní .
SFX 1724 N 1
SFX 1724 ňať níme .
SFX 1725 N 1
SFX 1725 ňať níte .
SFX 1726 N 1
SFX 1726 ňať nia .
SFX 1727 N 1
SFX 1727 ňať niac .
SFX 1728 N 1
SFX 1728 er ry .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 a 0 .
PFX 1729 Y 1
PFX 1729 fľ fli .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 o 0 .
PFX 1730 Y 1
PFX 1730 g gi .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 y 0 .
PFX 1731 Y 1
PFX 1731 ga gá .
SFX 1732 N 1
SFX 1732 iba íb .
SFX 1733 N 1
SFX 1733 oty ôt .
SFX 1734 Y 1
SFX 1734 a 0 .
PFX 1734 Y 1
PFX 1734 ga gá .
SFX 1735 N 1
SFX 1735 on í .
SFX 1736 N 1
SFX 1736 on anmi .
SFX 1737 N 1
SFX 1737 ter etra .
SFX 1738 N 1
SFX 1738 azda ázd .
SFX 1739 N 1
SFX 1739 iná ín .
SFX 1740 N 1
SFX 1740 ťa te .
SFX 1741 N 1
SFX 1741 ťa ti .
SFX 1742 N 1
SFX 1742 idy íd .
SFX 1743 N 1
SFX 1743 apo áp .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 a 0 .
PFX 1744 Y 1
PFX 1744 gi gí .
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 o 0 .
PFX 1745 Y 1
PFX 1745 gi gí .
SFX 1746 N 1
SFX 1746 0 s .
SFX 1747 N 1
SFX 1747 uba úb .
SFX 1748 Y 1
SFX 1748 o 0 .
PFX 1748 Y 1
PFX 1748 gu gú .
SFX 1749 N 1
SFX 1749 uča úč .
SFX 1750 N 1
SFX 1750 eľ ľovi .
SFX 1751 N 1
SFX 1751 ala ál .
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 a 0 .
PFX 1752 Y 1
PFX 1752 ha há .
SFX 1753 N 1
SFX 1753 ra ár .
SFX 1754 N 1
SFX 1754 urda úrd .
SFX 1755 N 1
SFX 1755 en ie .
SFX 1756 N 1
SFX 1756 en ých .
SFX 1757 N 1
SFX 1757 en ým .
SFX 1758 N 1
SFX 1758 en ými .
SFX 1759 N 1
SFX 1759 en oho .
SFX 1760 N 1
SFX 1760 en omu .
SFX 1761 N 1
SFX 1761 en om .
SFX 1762 N 1
SFX 1762 en í .
SFX 1763 N 1
SFX 1763 o ie .
SFX 1764 N 1
SFX 1764 o ých .
SFX 1765 N 1
SFX 1765 o ým .
SFX 1766 N 1
SFX 1766 o ými .
SFX 1767 N 1
SFX 1767 á ie .
SFX 1768 N 1
SFX 1768 lo iev .
SFX 1769 N 1
SFX 1769 ko šie .
SFX 1770 Y 1
SFX 1770 ko šie .
PFX 1770 Y 1
PFX 1770 0 naj .
SFX 1771 N 1
SFX 1771 ký ší .
SFX 1772 N 1
SFX 1772 ký šieho .
SFX 1773 N 1
SFX 1773 ký šiemu .
SFX 1774 N 1
SFX 1774 ký šom .
SFX 1775 N 1
SFX 1775 ký ším .
SFX 1776 N 1
SFX 1776 ký ších .
SFX 1777 N 1
SFX 1777 ký šími .
SFX 1778 N 1
SFX 1778 ký šie .
SFX 1779 N 1
SFX 1779 ký šia .
SFX 1780 N 1
SFX 1780 ký šej .
SFX 1781 N 1
SFX 1781 ký šiu .
SFX 1782 N 1
SFX 1782 ký šou .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 ký ší .
PFX 1783 Y 1
PFX 1783 0 naj .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 ký šieho .
PFX 1784 Y 1
PFX 1784 0 naj .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 ký šiemu .
PFX 1785 Y 1
PFX 1785 0 naj .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 ký šom .
PFX 1786 Y 1
PFX 1786 0 naj .
SFX 1787 Y 1
SFX 1787 ký ším .
PFX 1787 Y 1
PFX 1787 0 naj .
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 ký ších .
PFX 1788 Y 1
PFX 1788 0 naj .
SFX 1789 Y 1
SFX 1789 ký šími .
PFX 1789 Y 1
PFX 1789 0 naj .
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 ký šie .
PFX 1790 Y 1
PFX 1790 0 naj .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 ký šia .
PFX 1791 Y 1
PFX 1791 0 naj .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 ký šej .
PFX 1792 Y 1
PFX 1792 0 naj .
SFX 1793 Y 1
SFX 1793 ký šiu .
